Massachusetts, session 194th, H413.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 81 of Chapter 93 of the General Laws, as appearing most recently in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting at the end thereof, the following new words:-
Provided, that health clubs who have under contract two-hundred members or less, and
who also use websites for the execution of their business, shall have a conspicuous option on
their website where members may immediately cancel their membership contracts.
of 1